Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB878.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3801 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 3801. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Medical marijuana." Marijuana used lawfully in accordance with the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act.* * *Section 2. Section 3802(d)(1) of Title 75 is amended and the 12345678910111213141516171819 section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3802. Driving under influence of alcohol or controlled substance.* * *(d) Controlled substances.--An individual may not drive, operate or be in actual physical control of the movement of a vehicle under any of the following circumstances:(1) [There] Except as provided for in subsection (h), there is in the individual's blood any amount of a:(i) Schedule I controlled substance, as defined in the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act;(ii) Schedule II or Schedule III controlled substance, as defined in The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, which has not been medically prescribed for the individual; or(iii) metabolite of a substance under subparagraph (i) or (ii).* * *(h) Defense.--(1) It shall be a defense to a charge of violating subsection (d)(1) if the controlled substance is medical marijuana.(2) This subsection does not apply to an individual holding a commercial driver's license.Section 3. Section 3810 of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 3810. Authorized use not a defense.[The] Except as provided in section 3802(h) (relating to driving under influence of alcohol or controlled substance), the fact that a person charged with violating this chapter is or has 20250HB0878PN0918 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 been legally entitled to use alcohol or controlled substances is not a defense to a charge of violating this chapter.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0878PN0918 - 3 - 123